California statutes. Civil Code
 canine or feline toxicological experiment in this state to achieve discovery, approval, maintenance of approval, notification, registration, or maintenance of a pesticide or chemical substance, unless the experiment is conducted pursuant to any of the following:

(1) To satisfy an express requirement imposed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) under the authority of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.) and the Toxic Substances Control Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.), including any EPA rule, regulation, or order.

(2) To support an application to the EPA for a waiver from
 the requirements in paragraph (1), provided that testing is conducted solely to reduce the total number of animals needed for experiments to achieve discovery, approval, maintenance of approval, notification, registration, or maintenance of a pesticide or chemical substance.

 (3) To satisfy an express requirement imposed by the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) per the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.) or any binding agency regulation promulgated upon notice and comment thereunder.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Attorney General, the district attorney of the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred, or a city attorney of a city or city and county having a population in excess of 750,000
 and in which the violation is alleged to have occurred, may bring a civil action for injunctive relief pursuant to this paragraph. If the court determines that the Attorney General, district attorney, or city attorney is the prevailing party in the enforcement action, the official may also recover costs, attorney fees, and a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day that each dog or each cat is used in a canine or feline toxicological experiment in violation of this section.

(2) The procedure set forth in paragraph (1) is the exclusive remedy for enforcing this section.

(d) The prohibition in subdivision (b) shall not apply to
 either of the following:

(1) Medical research.

(2) Testing or experimentation conducted for the purpose of developing, manufacturing, or marketing any product intended for beneficial use in dogs or cats.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 551, Sec. 2.   (SB 879)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.9.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, it is unlawful for a manufacturer to import for profit, sell, or offer for sale in this state, any cosmetic, if the cosmetic was developed or manufactured using an animal test that was conducted or contracted by the manufacturer, or any supplier of the manufacturer, on or after January 1, 2020.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Animal test” means the internal or external application of a cosmetic, either in its final form or any ingredient thereof, to the skin, eyes, or other body part of a live, nonhuman vertebrate.

(2) “Cosmetic” means any article intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance, including, but not limited to, personal hygiene products such as deodorant, shampoo, or conditioner.

(3) “Ingredient” means any component of a cosmetic as defined by Section 700.3 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) “Manufacturer” means any person whose name appears on the label of a cosmetic product
 pursuant to the requirements of Section 701.12 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) “Supplier” means any entity that supplies, directly or through a third party, any ingredient used in the formulation of a manufacturer’s cosmetic.

(c) The prohibitions in subdivision (a) do not apply to the following:

(1) An animal test of any cosmetic that is required by a federal or state regulatory authority if all of the following apply:

(A) The ingredient is in wide use and cannot be replaced by another ingredient capable of performing a similar function.

(B) A specific human health problem is substantiated and the need to conduct animal tests is justified and is supported by a detailed
 research protocol proposed as the basis for the evaluation.

(C) There is not a nonanimal alternative method accepted for the relevant endpoint by the relevant federal or state regulatory authority.

(2) An animal test that was conducted to comply with a requirement of a foreign regulatory authority, if no evidence derived from the test was relied upon to substantiate the safety of the cosmetic sold in California by the manufacturer. 

(3) An animal test that was conducted on any product or ingredient subject to the requirements of Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 351 et seq.). 

(4) An animal test that was conducted for noncosmetic purposes in response to a requirement of a federal, state, or foreign regulatory authority, if
 no evidence derived from the test was relied upon to substantiate the safety of the cosmetic sold in California by the manufacturer. A manufacturer is not prohibited from reviewing, assessing, or retaining evidence from an animal test conducted pursuant to this paragraph.

(d) A violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and an additional one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the violation continues.

(e) A violation of this section may be enforced by the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurred, or by the city attorney of the city in which the violation occurred. The civil fine shall be paid to the entity that is authorized to bring the action.

(f) A district attorney or city attorney may, upon a determination that there is a reasonable
 likelihood of a violation of this section, review the testing data upon which a cosmetic manufacturer has relied in the development or manufacturing of the relevant cosmetic product sold in the state. Information provided under this section shall be protected as a trade secret as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1. Consistent with the procedures described in Section 3426.5, a district attorney or city attorney shall enter a protective order with a manufacturer before receipt of information from a manufacturer pursuant to this section, and shall take other appropriate measures necessary to preserve the confidentiality of information provided pursuant to this section. 

(g) This section shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) A cosmetic, if the cosmetic, in its final form, was sold in California or tested on animals prior to January 1, 2020, even if the cosmetic is
 manufactured after that date.

(2) An ingredient, if the ingredient was sold in California or tested on animals prior to January 1, 2020, even if the ingredient is manufactured after that date.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, cosmetic inventory found to be in violation of this section may be sold for a period of 180 days. 

(i) No county or political subdivision of the state may establish or continue any prohibition on or relating to animal tests, as defined in this section, that is not identical to the prohibitions set forth in this section and that does not include the exemptions contained in subdivision (c). 

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 899, Sec. 1.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1835.

A depositary may not use the thing deposited, or permit it to be used, for any purpose, without the consent of the depositor. He may not, if it is purposely fastened by the depositor, open it without the consent of the latter, except in case of necessity.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1836.

A depositary is liable for any damage happening to the thing deposited, during his wrongful use thereof, unless such damage must inevitably have happened though the property had not been thus used.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1837.

If a thing deposited is in actual danger of perishing before instructions can be obtained from the depositor, the depositary may sell it for the best price obtainable, and retain the proceeds as a deposit, giving immediate notice of his proceedings to the depositor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1838.

If a thing is lost or injured during its deposit, and the depositary refuses to inform the depositor of the circumstances under which the loss or injury occurred, so far as he has information concerning them, or willfully misrepresents the circumstances to him, the depositary is presumed to have willfully, or by gross negligence, permitted the loss or injury to occur.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1839.

So far as any service is rendered by a depositary, or required from him, his duties and liabilities are prescribed by the Title on Employment and Service.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1840.]

Section Eighteen Hundred and Forty. The liability of a depositary for negligence cannot exceed the amount which he is informed by the depositor, or has reason to suppose, the thing deposited to be worth.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Gratuitous Deposit [1844. - 1847.]

1844.

Gratuitous deposit is a deposit for which the depositary receives no consideration beyond the mere possession of the thing deposited.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1845.

An involuntary deposit is gratuitous, the depositary being entitled to no reward. However, an involuntary depositary of any live animal may accept advertised rewards or rewards freely offered by the owner of the animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 752, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1846.

(a) A gratuitous depositary must use, at least, slight care for the preservation of the thing deposited.

(b) A gratuitous depositary of a living animal shall provide the animal with necessary and prompt veterinary care, adequate nutrition and water, and shelter, and shall treat it humanely and, if the animal has any identification, make reasonable attempts to notify the owner of the animal’s location. Any gratuitous depositary that does not have sufficient resources or desire to provide that care shall promptly turn the animal over to an appropriate care facility.

(c) If the gratuitous depositary of a living animal is a public
 animal shelter, shelter operated by a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or humane shelter, the depositary shall comply with all other requirements of the Food and Agricultural Code regarding the impounding of live animals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   (AB 1553)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1847.

The duties of a gratuitous depositary cease:

(a) Upon restoration by the depositary of the thing deposited to its owner.

(b) Upon reasonable notice given by the depositary to the owner to remove it, and the owner failing to do so within a reasonable time. But an involuntary depositary, under subdivision (b) of Section 1815, may not give notice until the emergency that gave rise to the deposit is past. This subdivision shall not apply to a public animal shelter, a shelter operated by a
 society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or a humane shelter. The duty to provide care, as required by Section 1846, continues until the public or private animal shelter is lawfully relieved of responsibility for the animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 7, Sec. 3.   (AB 1553)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Storage [1851. - 1857.]

1851.

A deposit not gratuitous is called storage. The depositary in such case is called a depositary for hire.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1852.

A depositary for hire must use at least ordinary care for the preservation of the thing deposited.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1853.

In the absence of a different agreement or usage, a depositary for hire is entitled to one week’s hire for the sustenance and shelter of living animals during any fraction of a week, and to half a month’s hire for the storage of any other property during any fraction of a half month.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1854.

In the absence of an agreement as to the length of time during which a deposit is to continue, it may be terminated by the depositor at any time, and by the depositary upon reasonable notice.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1855.

Notwithstanding an agreement respecting the length of time during which a deposit is to continue, it may be terminated by the depositor on paying all that would become due to the depositary in case of the deposit so continuing.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1856.

A depositary for hire has a lien for storage charges and for advances and insurance incurred at the request of the bailor, and for money necessarily expended in and about the care, preservation and keeping of the property stored, and he also has a lien for money advanced at the request of the bailor, to discharge a prior lien, and for the expenses of a sale where default has been made in satisfying a valid lien. The rights of the depositary for hire to such lien are regulated by the title on liens.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1909, Ch. 664.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.

If from any cause other than want of ordinary care and diligence on his part, a depositary for hire is unable to deliver perishable property, baggage, or luggage received by him for storage, or to collect his charges for storage due thereon, he may cause such property to be sold, in open market, to satisfy his lien for storage; provided, that no property except perishable property shall be sold, under the provisions of this section, upon which storage charges shall not be due and unpaid for one year at the time of such sale.

All Acts and parts of Acts in conflict with the provisions of this Act are hereby repealed.

This Act shall take effect from and after its passage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1891, Ch. 249.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Deposits for Repair, Alteration or Sale [1858. - 1858.3.]

1858.

As used in this article:

(a) “Customer” means a natural person who deals with a depositary.

(b) “Depositary” means a person who in the ordinary course of business regularly receives property from customers for the purpose of repair or alteration. 

(c) “Property” means personal property used for or intended for personal, family, or household purposes, but does not include any motor vehicle within the meaning of Section 415 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.1.

Every depositary shall, upon accepting property from a customer, present the customer with written receipt which shall include a statement, if such is the case, that such deposited property is not insured or protected to the amount of the actual cash value thereof by the depositary against loss occasioned by theft, fire, and vandalism while such property remains with the depositary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1185.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.2.

Every depositary who fails to furnish the receipt, or a statement thereon as required by Section 1858.1, or who makes any misrepresentation in such receipt, shall be strictly liable to the customer for any loss occasioned by theft, fire, or vandalism while such property remains with the depositary and shall forfeit any lien or other right to hold the property arising from services rendered in holding, repairing, altering, or selling the property. When liability is imposed upon a depositary under this section it shall be deemed as having been imposed for the commission of a willful act for the purposes of Section 533 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1185.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.3.

If the depositary by insurance or by self-insurance does protect property deposited by customers for loss or damage occasioned by theft, fire or vandalism while such property remains with the depositary, such depositary need not make or deliver to customer any notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1185.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Innkeepers [1859. - 1867.]

1859.

The liability of an innkeeper, hotelkeeper, operator of a licensed hospital, rest home or sanitarium, furnished apartment house keeper, furnished bungalow court keeper, boardinghouse or lodginghouse keeper, for losses of or injuries to personal property, is that of a depositary for hire; provided, however, that in no case shall such liability exceed the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the aggregate. In no case shall liability exceed, for each item of described property, the respective sums of five hundred dollars ($500) for each trunk and its contents, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each valise or traveling bag
 and its contents, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each box, bundle or package and its contents, and two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for all other personal property of any kind, unless he shall have consented in writing with the owner thereof to assume a greater liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 705.)
-------------------------------------------

1860.

If an innkeeper, hotelkeeper, operator of a licensed hospital, rest home or sanitarium, boardinghouse or lodginghouse keeper, keeps a fireproof safe and gives notice to a guest, patient, boarder or lodger, either personally or by putting up a printed notice in a prominent place in the office or the room occupied by the guest, patient, boarder, or lodger, that he keeps such a safe and will not be liable for money, jewelry, documents, furs, fur coats and fur garments, or other articles of unusual value and small compass, unless placed therein, he is not liable, except so far as his own acts shall contribute thereto, for any
 loss of or injury to such articles, if not deposited with him to be placed therein, nor in any case for more than the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for any or all such property of any individual guest, patient, boarder, or lodger, unless he shall have given a receipt in writing therefor to such guest, patient, boarder or lodger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 705.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.

Hotel, motel, inn, boardinghouse, and lodginghouse keepers shall have a lien upon the baggage and other property belonging to or legally under the control of their guests, boarders, tenants, or lodgers which may be in such hotel, motel, inn, or boarding or lodging house for the proper charges due from such guests, boarders, tenants, or lodgers, for their accommodation, board and lodging and room rent, and such extras as are furnished at their request, and for all money paid for or advanced to such guests, boarders, tenants, or lodgers, and for the costs of enforcing such lien. The lien may be enforced only
 after final judgment in an action brought to recover such charges or moneys. During the pendency of the proceeding, the plaintiff may take possession of the baggage and property pursuant to a writ of possession as provided by Sections 1861.1 to 1861.27, inclusive. However, if any baggage or property becoming subject to the lien herein provided for does not belong to the guest, lodger, tenant, or boarder who incurred the charges or indebtedness secured thereby, at the time when such charges or indebtedness was incurred, and if the hotel, motel, inn, boarding or lodging house keeper entitled to such lien receives notice of such fact at any time before the sale of such baggage or property hereunder, then, and in that event, such baggage and property which is subject to said lien and did not belong to said guest, boarder, tenant, or lodger at the time when such charges or indebtedness was incurred shall not be subject to this lien.

Any property which is exempt from
 enforcement of a money judgment is not subject to the lien provided for in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.1.

Definitions for purposes of Sections 1861 through 1861.27 include the following:

(a) “Hotel”, “motel”, “inn”, “boardinghouse”, and “lodginghouse keeper” means any person, corporation, partnership, unincorporated association, public entity, or agent of any of the aforementioned, who offers and accepts payment for rooms, sleeping accommodations, or board and lodging and retains the right of access to, and control of, the dwelling unit.

(b) “Levying officer” means the sheriff or marshal who is directed to execute a writ of possession issued pursuant to this article.

(c) “Plaintiff” means any party filing a complaint or cross complaint.

(d) “Probable validity” means that the plaintiff, more likely than not, will obtain a judgment against the defendant on the plaintiff’s claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.5.

(a) Upon the filing of a complaint, or at any time thereafter, the plaintiff may apply, pursuant to this article, for a writ of possession by filing an application for the writ with the court in which the action was filed.

(b) The application shall be executed under oath and shall include all of the following:

(1) A showing of the basis of the plaintiff’s claim, including a showing that the plaintiff is entitled to possession of the property claimed pursuant to an innkeepers’
 lien.

(2) A general description of the property and a statement of its value.

(3) A statement of the amount of money claimed to be owed by the guest, lodger, tenant, or boarder.

(c) The requirements of subdivision (b) may be satisfied by one or more affidavits filed with the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.6.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no writ shall be issued under this article except after a hearing on a noticed motion.

(b) A writ of possession may be issued ex parte pursuant to this subdivision, if probable cause appears that the following conditions exist:

(1) The property is not necessary for the support of the defendant or his family;

(2) There is an immediate danger that the property will
 become unavailable to levy, by reason of being transferred, concealed, or removed from the state, or the premises of the motel, hotel, inn, boardinghouse, or lodginghouse, or will become substantially impaired in value by acts of destruction or by failure to take care of the property in a reasonable manner; and

(3) The ex parte issuance of a writ of possession is necessary to protect the property.

(4) The plaintiff establishes the probable validity of the plaintiff’s claim. 

The plaintiff’s application for the writ shall satisfy the requirements of Section 1861.5 and, in addition, shall include a showing that the conditions required by this subdivision exist. A writ of possession may issue if the court finds that the conditions required by this subdivision exist, and the requirements of Section 1861.5 are met. Where a writ of possession
 has been issued pursuant to this subdivision, a copy of the summons and complaint, a copy of the application and any affidavit in support thereof, and a notice which satisfies the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1861.8 and informs the defendant of his rights under this subdivision shall be served upon the defendant, and any other person required by Section 1861.8 to be served with a writ of possession. Any defendant whose property has been taken pursuant to a writ of possession issued under this subdivision may apply for an order that the writ be quashed, and any property levied on pursuant to the writ be released. Such application shall be made by noticed motion, and the provisions of Section 1861.9 shall apply. Pending the hearing of the defendant’s application, the court may order that delivery pursuant to Section 1861.19 of any property previously levied upon be stayed. If the court determines that the plaintiff is not entitled to a writ of possession, the court shall quash the writ
 of possession and order the release and redelivery of any property previously levied upon, and shall award the defendant any damages sustained by the defendant which were proximately caused by the levy of the writ of possession and the loss of possession of the property pursuant to such levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.7.

Prior to the hearing required by subdivision (a) of Section 1861.6, the defendant shall be served with all of the following:

(a) A copy of the summons and complaint.

(b) Notice of application and hearing.

(c) A copy of the application and any affidavit filed in support thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.8.

The “Notice of Application and Hearing” shall inform the defendant of all of the following:

(a) The hearing will be held at a place and at a time, to be specified in the notice, on plaintiff’s application for writ of possession.

(b) The writ shall be issued if the court finds that the plaintiff’s claim has probable validity and the other requirements for issuing the writ are established. The hearing is not for the purpose of determining whether the claim is actually valid; such determination shall
 be made in subsequent proceedings in the action.

(c) If the defendant desires to oppose the issuance of the writ, he shall file with the court either an affidavit providing evidence sufficient to defeat the plaintiff’s right to issuance of the writ, or an undertaking to stay the delivery of the property in accordance with Section 1861.22.

(d) The notice shall contain the following statement in 10-point bold type:
“If you believe the plaintiff may not be entitled to possession of the property claimed, you may wish to seek the advice of an attorney. Such attorney should be consulted promptly so that he may assist you before the time set for the hearing.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.9.

Each party shall file with the court and serve upon the other party within the time prescribed by rule, any affidavits and points and authorities intended to be relied upon at the hearing. At the hearing, the court shall make its determination upon the basis of the pleadings and other papers in the record; but, upon good cause shown, the court may receive and consider additional evidence and authority produced at the hearing, or may continue the hearing for the production of additional evidence, oral or documentary, and the filing of other affidavits or points and authorities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.10.

(a) At the hearing a writ of possession shall issue if all of the following are found:

(1) The plaintiff has established the probable validity of his claim to possession of the property of the tenant, boarder, or lodger.

(2) That the property which is described within the application for the writ is located on the premises of the motel, hotel, boardinghouse or lodginghouse.

(3) The plaintiff has provided an
 undertaking as required by Section 1861.21. 

(b) No writ directing the levying officer to enter any premises to take possession of any property shall be issued unless the plaintiff has established that there is probable cause to believe that such property is located there.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.12.

The writ of possession shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Be directed to the levying officer within whose jurisdiction the property is located.

(b) Generally describe the property to be seized.

(c) Specify the apartment, motel, or other boarding premises that may be entered to take possession of the property, or some part of it.

(d) Direct the levying officer to levy on the property pursuant to Section 1861.18 if found on the described premises, and to retain custody of it until released or sold pursuant to Section 1861.19.

(e) Inform the defendant of the right to object to the plaintiff’s undertaking, a copy of which shall be attached to the writ, or to obtain the delivery of the property by filing an undertaking as prescribed by Section 1861.22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.13.

Neither the failure of the defendant to oppose the issuance of a writ of possession under this article, nor his failure to rebut any evidence produced by the plaintiff in connection with proceedings under this article, shall constitute a waiver of any defense to the plaintiff’s claim in the action, or any other action, or have any effect on the right of the defendant to produce or exclude evidence at the trial of any such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.14.

The determinations of the court under this article shall have no effect on the determination of any issues in the action, other than the issues relevant to proceedings under this article, nor shall they affect the rights of any party in any other action arising out of the same claim. The determinations of the court under this article shall not be given in evidence, or referred to in the trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.15.

If the plaintiff fails to recover judgment in the action, he shall redeliver the property to the defendant, and be liable for all damages sustained by the defendant, which are proximately caused by operation of the temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction, if any, the levy of the writ of possession, and the loss of possession of the property pursuant to the levy of the writ of possession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.16.

(a) At or after the time he files an application for a writ of possession, the plaintiff may apply for a temporary restraining order by setting forth in the application a statement of grounds justifying the issuance of such order.

(b) A temporary restraining order may issue ex parte if all the following are found:

(1) The plaintiff has established the probable validity of his claim and entitlement to possession of the property, pursuant to an innkeepers’ lien.

(2) The plaintiff has provided an undertaking as required by Section 1861.21. 

(3) The plaintiff has established the probable validity that there is an immediate danger that the property claimed may become unavailable to levy by reason of being transferred, concealed, or removed, or may become substantially impaired in value.

(c) If at the hearing on the issuance of the writ of possession the court determines that the plaintiff is not entitled to a writ of possession, the court shall dissolve any temporary restraining order; otherwise, the court may issue a preliminary injunction to remain in effect until the property claimed is seized pursuant to the writ of possession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.17.

In the discretion of the court, the temporary restraining order may prohibit the defendant from doing any or all of the following:

(a) Transferring any interest in the property by sale, pledge, or grant of security interest, or otherwise disposing of, or encumbering, the property.

(b) Concealing or otherwise removing the property in such a manner as to make it less available to seizure by the levying officer.

(c) Impairing the value
 of the property either by acts of destruction or by failure to care for the property in a reasonable manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.18.

(a) At the time of levy, the levying officer shall deliver to the person in possession of the property a copy of the writ of possession, with a copy of the plaintiff’s undertaking attached.

(b) If no one is in possession of the property at the time of levy, the levying officer shall subsequently serve the writ and attached undertaking on the defendant. If the defendant has appeared in the action, service shall be accomplished in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2. If the defendant has not
 appeared in the action, service shall be accomplished in the manner provided for the service of summons and complaint by Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.19.

(a) After the levying officer takes possession pursuant to the writ of possession, the levying officer shall keep the property in a secure place. Except as otherwise provided in Section 1861.6:

(1) If notice of the filing of an undertaking for redelivery or notice of objection to the undertaking is not received by the levying officer within 10 days after levy of the writ of possession, the levying officer shall deliver the property to plaintiff, upon receiving the fees for taking, and necessary expenses for keeping,
 the property.

(2) If notice of the filing of an undertaking for redelivery is received by the levying officer within 10 days after levy of the writ of possession, and no objection is made to the defendant’s undertaking, the levying officer shall redeliver the property to defendant upon expiration of the time to object, upon receiving the fees for taking and necessary expenses for keeping the property not already paid or advanced by the plaintiff.

(3) If notice of objection to the plaintiff’s undertaking or notice of the filing of an undertaking for redelivery is received within 10 days after levy of the writ of possession, and objection is made to the defendant’s undertaking, the levying officer shall not deliver or redeliver the property until the time provided in Section 1861.23.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision
 (a), when not otherwise provided by contract, and where an undertaking for redelivery has not been filed, upon a showing that the property is perishable, or will greatly deteriorate or depreciate in value, or for some other reason that the interest of the parties will be best served thereby, the court may order that the property be sold and the proceeds deposited in the court to abide the judgment in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 66.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.20.

The levying officer shall return the writ of possession, with his proceedings thereon, to the court in which the action is pending, within 30 days after a levy, but in no event more than 60 days after the writ is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.21.

The court shall not issue a temporary restraining order or a writ of possession until the plaintiff has filed with the court an undertaking. The undertaking shall provide that the sureties are bound to the defendant in the amount of the undertaking for the return of the property to the defendant, if the return thereof be ordered, and for the payment to the defendant of any sum recovered against plaintiff. The undertaking shall be in an amount not less than twice the value of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.22.

(a) The defendant may prevent the plaintiff from taking possession of property, pursuant to a writ of possession, or regain possession of property so taken, by filing with the court in which the action was brought an undertaking in an amount equal to the amount of the plaintiff’s undertaking required by Section 1861.21. The undertaking shall state that, if the plaintiff recovers judgment on the action, the defendant shall pay all costs awarded to the plaintiff and all damages that the plaintiff may sustain by reason of the loss of possession of the property, not exceeding the
 amount of the undertaking.

(b) The defendant’s undertaking may be filed at any time before or after the levy of the writ of possession. The defendant shall mail a copy of the undertaking to the levying officer.

(c) If an undertaking for redelivery is filed, and no objection is made to the undertaking, the levying officer shall deliver the property to the defendant, or, if the plaintiff has previously been given possession of the property, the plaintiff shall deliver the property to the defendant. If an undertaking for redelivery is filed and an objection to the undertaking is made, the provisions of Section 1861.23 apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.23.

(a) The defendant may object to the plaintiff’s undertaking not later than 10 days after levy of the writ of possession. The defendant shall mail notice of objection to the levying officer.

(b) The plaintiff may object to the defendant’s undertaking not later than 10 days after the defendant’s undertaking is filed. The plaintiff shall mail notice of objection to the levying officer .

(c) If the court determines that the plaintiff’s undertaking is not
 sufficient and a sufficient undertaking is not given within the time provided by statute, the court shall vacate the temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, if any, and the writ of possession and, if levy has occurred, order the levying officer or the plaintiff to return the property to the defendant. If the court determines that the plaintiff’s undertaking is sufficient, the court shall order the levying officer to deliver the property to the plaintiff.

(d) If the court determines that the defendant’s undertaking is not sufficient and a sufficient undertaking is not given within the time required by statute, the court shall order the levying officer to deliver the property to the plaintiff, or, if the plaintiff has previously been given possession of the property, the plaintiff shall retain possession. If the court determines the defendant’s undertaking is sufficient, the court shall order the levying officer or the plaintiff to
 deliver the property to the defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.24.
